test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_kauhee_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kauhia - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Nom: kauhia
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Gen: kauhian
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Par: kauhiaa
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Tra: kauhiaksi
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abe: kauhiatta
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ine: kauhiassa
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ela: kauhiasta
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ill: kauhihaan
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ade: kauhiala
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abl: kauhialta
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+All: kauhiale
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ess: kauhiana
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Nom: kauhiat
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Gen: kauheitten
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Par: kauheita
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Tra: kauheiksi
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abe: kauheitta
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ine: kauheissa
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ela: kauheista
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ill: kauheissiin
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ade: kauheila
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abl: kauheilta
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+All: kauheile
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ess: kauheina
     kauhee+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Com: kauheine
